Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF152.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1275YH (4) 91 lh/ko H.F. 152 Section 1. FINDINGS. The general assembly finds all of the 1 following: 2 1. The Iowa general assembly, in conjunction with state 3 agencies, has a duty to ensure Iowa children have access to 4 food and essential nutrition regardless of income level. 5 2. Summer can be a time of increased hunger for children who 6 no longer have access to regular school lunches. 7 3. Iowa is currently experiencing a food insecurity crisis 8 as food banks and other charitable organizations continue to 9 report record high demand from Iowans in need. 10 4. There are an estimated two hundred forty thousand 11 children in Iowa who would be eligible to receive benefits 12 under the summer electronic benefits transfer (EBT) for 13 children program, as established as a permanent program under 14 the federal Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2023, 42 U.S.C. 15 Â§1762. 16 5. When Iowans are struggling financially, they are more 17 likely to buy less expensive foods, which are high in calories 18 and low in nutritional value. 19 6. Summer congregate and noncongregate meals are not always 20 easily accessible to families in need, particularly in rural 21 Iowa. 22 7. The summer EBT for children program offered by the 23 federal government would provide an estimated twenty-nine 24 million dollars to address the food insecurity crisis, which 25 not only feeds children but stimulates local economic activity. 26 8. Iowa ended fiscal year 2023-2024 with a general fund 27 balance of two billion fifty-three million dollars. Iowa 28 can afford to feed hungry children and cover the costs of 29 administering the summer EBT for children program. 30 Sec. 2. PARTICIPATION IN SUMMER ELECTRONIC BENEFITS 31 TRANSFER (EBT) FOR CHILDREN PROGRAM ââ APPROPRIATION. 32 1. The department of health and human services, in 33 coordination with the department of education, shall do all of 34 the following: 35 -1- LSB 1275YH (4) 91 lh/ko 1/ 3 H.F. 152 a. Immediately upon the effective date of this Act, submit a 1 letter of intent to the United States secretary of agriculture 2 to apply for and participate in the summer EBT for children 3 program offered by the United States department of agriculture 4 food and nutrition service during summer 2025. 5 b. Coordinate with the United States department of 6 agriculture food and nutrition service to develop a successful 7 management and administration plan for the summer EBT for 8 children program, and submit the plan to the United States 9 secretary of agriculture by February 15, 2025. 10 2. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 11 to the department of health and human services for the fiscal 12 year beginning July 1, 2024, a sufficient amount to cover the 13 costs of administering the summer EBT for children program 14 during summer 2025. Moneys appropriated under this section 15 that remain unexpended or unencumbered at the close of the 16 fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain available for 17 expenditure in the succeeding fiscal year. 18 Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 19 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 20 Sec. 4. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 21 retroactively to July 1, 2024. 22